North Dakota, session 69, SB2175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-06-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
16.1-06-15. Mandatory testing of voting systems before each election and after tabulation of
ballots.
1. All voting systems used in this state must be tested according to guidelines established by the
secretary of state and as follows to ascertain whether the automatic tabulating equipment will
accurately count the votes cast for all offices and measures. The testing must be conducted
prior tobefore each election at which the system will be used. The testing must be done by the
county auditor or county auditor's designee, and after each test, the testing materials and any
preaudited ballots used during the test must be sealed and retained in the same manner as
election materials after an election.
2. The test of a voting system employing paper ballots must be conducted by processing a
preaudited group of ballots on which are recorded a predetermined number of valid votes for
each candidate and measure and must include for each office one or more ballots which have
votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the automatic
tabulating equipment to reject such votes. During the test a different number of valid votes
must be assigned to each candidate for an office and for and against each measure. If an
error is detected, the cause of it must be ascertained and corrected, and an errorless count
must be secured and filed as provided in this section.
3. The test must be conducted at least one week before the election. One week before the test is
conducted, the county auditor must send the district chairman of each political party having a
candidate on the ballot a notice of the test. The notice must state the time, place, and date of
the test or tests and that the district chairman or district chairman's designee may attend.
4. At the conclusion of the test, the programming for each voting device must be sealed within
the device with a unique numbered seal that must be verified by the election inspector before
the opening of the polls to make sure the programming has not been removed from the
device.
5. After each statewide primary, general, and special election, the secretary of state shall order a
random testing of the voting system programmingpostelection audit for one precinctpolling
location selected randomly in each county of the state according to logic and accuracy testing
procedures detailed in subsection 2 and as may be further defined by the. The postelection
audit must be commenced on the sixth day following election day and concluded by the eighth
day following election day. The county recorder shall deliver to the county auditor the wrapped
ballots from the polling location subject to the postelection audit. The secretary of state may
further define the procedure for conducting a postelection audit in writing. This test is to be
conducted before the meeting of the county canvassing board.
6. The county auditor shall appoint an election board consistent with the procedure under section
16.1 - 05 - 01 to conduct the postelection audit. The county auditor shall notice the date, time ,

S. B. NO. 2175 - PAGE 2
and location of the postelection audit. The election board shall review the ballots received
under subsection 5 from one federal contest, one statewide contest, one legislative contest if a
legislative contest appeared on the ballot, and one county contest. If the election board
discovers a discrepancy between the automated tabulating equipment and the results of the
postelection audit, the secretary of state may request additional postelection audits within the
county, which must serve as the official record used during canvassing.
7. Upon completion of the postelection audit, the election board shall prepare the ballots as
specified in section 16.1 - 15 - 08 and the county auditor shall deliver the ballots to the county
recorder for storage as required under section 16.1 - 15 - 13. The election board shall submit the
results of the postelection audit to the secretary of state, who shall publish the results.

S. B. NO. 2175 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2175.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 2 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State